Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.820

Board of adjustment—Quasi-judicial powers.

The board of adjustment may also exercise such other quasi-judicial powers as may be granted by county ordinance.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.820. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 82.]